Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,132
Historical vehicles; storage; conditions.

Subject to land-use regulations of a county or municipality, a collector may store any motor vehicles, trailers, or parts vehicles, licensed or unlicensed, operable or inoperable, on his or her property if such motor vehicles, trailers, and parts vehicles and any outdoor storage areas are maintained in such a manner that they do not constitute a health hazard and if the motor vehicles, trailers, and parts vehicles are located away from ordinary public view or are screened from ordinary public view by means of a fence, rapidly growing trees, shrubbery, opaque covering, or other appropriate means.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 132;

Laws 2006, LB 663, § 32.

Defendant who engaged in conduct clearly proscribed by this section lacks standing to attack the statute as vague. Defendant who failed to show that the proscriptions of this section reached a substantial amount of constitutionally protected conduct lacks standing to challenge it based on overbreadth. State v. Sommerfeld, 251 Neb. 876, 560 N.W.2d 420 (1997).